Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.34.040

Biennial budget authorized—Limitations.

All code cities are authorized to establish by ordinance a two-year fiscal biennium budget. The ordinance shall be enacted at least six months prior to commencement of the fiscal biennium and this chapter applies to all code cities which utilize a fiscal biennium budget. Code cities which establish a fiscal biennium budget are authorized to repeal such ordinance and provide for reversion to a fiscal year budget. The ordinance may only be repealed effective as of the conclusion of a fiscal biennium. However, the city shall comply with chapter 35A.33 RCW in developing and adopting the budget for the first fiscal year following repeal of the ordinance.

[ 1985 c 175 s 36.]